District of Columbia statutes.
47-841

Valuation of federal property — Secretary of Interior to designate persons and regulations.

All valuations of property belonging to the United States shall be made by such persons as the Secretary of the Interior shall appoint, and under such regulations as he shall prescribe.

History

R.S., D.C., § 139
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-841.
1973 Ed., § 47-723.